Utah statutes.
63M-1-2305.   Annual report.
(1)  The office shall make a report to the Legislature's Workforce Services
and Community and Economic Development Interim Committee by October 1 of each
year until the fund is terminated under Subsection 63M-1-2303(5)(b).
(2)  The report required by Subsection (1) shall provide information
concerning deployment of broadband service using grants from the fund, pending
applications, the balance remaining in the fund, and suggested appropriations
to the fund to achieve the purposes of this part.
